Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.200

Determination by county annexation review board—Factors considered—Filing of findings and decision.

The jurisdiction of the county annexation review board shall be invoked upon the filing with the board of a resolution for an annexation election as provided in RCW 35A.14.015, or of a petition for an annexation election as provided in RCW 35A.14.030, and the board shall proceed to hold a hearing, upon notice, all as provided in RCW 35A.14.040. A verbatim record shall be made of all testimony presented at the hearing and upon request and payment of the reasonable costs thereof, a copy of the transcript of such testimony shall be provided to any person or governmental unit. The board shall make and file its decision, all as provided in RCW 35A.14.050, insofar as said section is applicable to the matter before the board. Dissenting members of the board shall have the right to have their written dissents included as part of the decision. In reaching a decision on an annexation proposal, the county annexation review board shall consider the factors affecting such proposal, which shall include but not be limited to the following:

(1) The immediate and prospective population of the area proposed to be annexed, the configuration of the area, land use and land uses, comprehensive use plans and zoning, per capita assessed valuation, topography, natural boundaries and drainage basins, the likelihood of significant growth in the area and in adjacent incorporated and unincorporated areas during the next ten years, location and coordination of community facilities and services; and

(2) The need for municipal services and the available municipal services, effect of ordinances and governmental codes, regulations and resolutions on existing uses, present cost and adequacy of governmental services and controls, the probable future needs for such services and controls, the probable effect of the annexation proposal or alternatives on cost and adequacy of services and controls in area and adjacent area, the effect on the finances, debt structure, and contractual obligations and rights of all affected governmental units; and

(3) The effect of the annexation proposal or alternatives on adjacent areas, on mutual economic and social interests, and on the local governmental structure of the county.

The county annexation review board shall determine whether the proposed annexation would be in the public interest and for the public welfare. The decision of the board shall be accompanied by the findings of the board. Such findings need not include specific data on all the factors listed in this section, but shall indicate that all such factors were considered.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 11; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.200.]

NOTES: